Maine, session 132, LD329.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 29-A MRSA §2308, sub-§6, as amended by PL 2019, c. 318, §4, is further
amended to read:
6. Penalty. A violation of subsection 2 is a Class E crime that is punishable by a $250
$1,000 minimum fine for the first offense and a mandatory 30-day suspension of a driver's
license for a 2nd offense occurring within 3 years of the first offense.